Colorado statutes. TITLE 26.5 Early Childhood Programs and Services
PART 3
CHILD CARE SERVICES AND
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER TREATMENT

26.5-3-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Facility" means an agency meeting the standards described in section 27-81-106 (1) and approved pursuant to section 27-81-106.

"Pilot program" means the child care services and substance use disorder treatment pilot program created in this part 3.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 612, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.9-101 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-302. Child care services and substance use disorder treatment pilot program - created - purposes - eligibility - evaluation - funding - rules.

There is created in the department the child care services and substance use disorder treatment pilot program. The department shall administer the pilot program as a two-generation initiative. The purpose of the pilot program is to:

Provide grants to enhance the existing child care resource and referral programs to provide increased child care navigation capacity in one rural pilot program site and one urban pilot program site to serve pregnant and parenting women seeking or participating in substance use disorder treatment; and

Provide a grant to enhance the capacity of the existing child care resource and referral program's centralized call center to serve pregnant and parenting women seeking or participating in substance use disorder treatment; and

Provide implementation grants to pilot a regional mobile child care model that is licensed in compliance with part 3 of article 5 of this title 26.5 or as defined in section 26.5-5-303 and that serves children under five years of age in at least three facilities that provide substance use disorder treatment to parenting women. Applicants for mobile child care pilot grants must demonstrate a commitment of sources of private money for mobile child care to ensure that the mobile child care pilot model is an initiative of a public-private partnership. The mobile child care pilot model may be expanded to serve additional ages or additional regions using gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources that the department may seek, accept, and expend.

The department shall ensure that there is adequate training, cross-training, technical assistance, data collection, and evaluation for grants awarded pursuant to subsections (1)(a)(I), (1)(a)(II), and (1)(a)(III) of this section.

The department shall determine the eligibility and selection criteria for pilot program grants. The department may promulgate rules, as necessary, to implement the pilot program.

A pilot program grantee may use the grant money for improved technology, supplies, and materials to implement the pilot program; to hire staff for pilot program oversight and implementation; and for pilot program evaluation.

On or before June 30, 2023, the department shall provide to the health and insurance and public health care and human services committees of the house of representatives and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, any completed pilot program evaluations pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section, as well as a summary of the pilot program, including grants awarded and the outcome of the grants.

The department may use a portion of any money appropriated for the pilot program to pay the direct and indirect costs incurred to administer the pilot program, not to exceed ten percent of the appropriation.

The department may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 3. The department shall transmit all money received for the pilot program through gifts, grants, or donations to the state treasurer.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 612, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.9-102 as it existed prior to 2022.

26.5-3-303. Repeal of part.

This part 3 is repealed, effective July 1, 2028.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire article added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 613, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-6.9-103 as it existed prior to 2022.